Utah statutes.
10-9a-604.   Subdivision plat approval procedure -- Effect of not complying.
(1)  A person may not submit a subdivision plat to the county recorder's
office for recording unless:
(a)  the person has complied with the requirements of Subsection
10-9a-603(4)(a);
(b)  the plat has been approved by:
(i)  the land use authority of the municipality in which the land described in
the plat is located; and
(ii)  other officers that the municipality designates in its ordinance; and
(c)  all approvals described in Subsection (1)(b) are entered in writing on
the plat by the designated officers.
(2)  A subdivision plat recorded without the signatures required under this
section is void.
(3)  A transfer of land pursuant to a void plat is voidable.
